Arkansas, session 2025, HB1055.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 21, Chapter 5, Subchapter 4, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
21-5-425. Coverage for diagnosis and treatment of Alzheimer's disease
or other dementia-related disease — Legislative findings and intent — Rules.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Alzheimer's disease is the seventh leading cause of death in
Arkansas according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention;
(2) The cost of managing the complications of late-stage
Alzheimer's disease, largely due to delayed diagnosis and access to
treatment, outweighs the cost of expeditious and effective treatment;
(3) The diagnosis and treatment of Alzheimer's disease or other
*ANS058*
01-30-2025 10:13:32 ANS058

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 HB1055
dementia-related disease should be a clinical decision made by a physician
based on evidence-based guidelines; and
(4) The United States Food and Drug Administration has granted
approval for treatments of patients in the early stages of Alzheimer's
disease.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide coverage for
the diagnosis and treatment of Alzheimer's disease or other dementia-related
disease.
(c) Each state employee's and public school employee's health benefit
plan under the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program that
is offered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, shall offer
coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of Alzheimer's disease or other
dementia-related disease as determined by a physician licensed to practice
medicine in this state and according to the standards or guidance established
by the United States Food and Drug Administration.
(d) The coverage and treatment of Alzheimer's disease or other
dementia-related disease offered under subsection (c) of this section shall:
(1) Be a treatment or medication that has been approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration to treat or slow the progression
of Alzheimer's disease or other dementia-related disease;
(2) Include without limitation:
(A) Any diagnostic testing that is necessary for a
physician to determine the appropriate use of treatments and medications
under subdivision (d)(1) of this section; and
(B) All treatments or medications prescribed to slow the
progression of Alzheimer's disease or other dementia-related disease; and
(3) Not be subject to step therapy protocols.
(e) The State Board of Finance may promulgate rules to implement this
section.

/s/J. Mayberry





01-30-2025 10:13:32 ANS058